src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_80RAPAHUTMA !!= * @CODE@ rapahutma:rapahuta
!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:%^VowRM BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) rapahutma
!! +Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 
!! +Jus, 

!! Strengthen consonant
: BACK_INF_ZEROq ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) rapahutaq
!! Inf 
!! Strengthen consonant 
:%^VowRM BACK_ACT-PRSPRC-SG-NOM_va ; !!= * @CODE@ (2b) rapahutva
!! Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:%^VowRM BACK_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) rapahutnuq
!! +Act+PrfPrc

!! Retain consonant 
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>õ BACK_LUGÕMA_PSS-PRC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) rapahudõ
!! Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc, 


!! Retain consonant and add õ
:%^Pen%^WGStem BACK_LUGÕMA_IND-CONNEGII ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) rapahuda
!! Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
!! Pss+Ind

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:%^VowRM BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-3_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) rapahut
!! Ind+Prs+ 3

!! Strengthen consonant and replace stem vowel with i
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i BACK_LOGÕMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) rapahudi
!! Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

!! Strengthen consonant and add ʼ
:%^VowRM%>ʼ BACK_LUGÕMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) tullʼ
!! Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3


LEXICON V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hämmähütmä:hämmähüt
+V:%^WGStema FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:ä FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:ä FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_äq ;
+V:a FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStemõ FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_81TEGEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tegemä:teg
!! * Yaml: __tegemä__
!! Work
+V:%^WGSteme FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
!+V:ä FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:e V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
!+V:ä FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq ;
!+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>se K ;
!+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG1_se ;
!+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
!+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_se ;
!+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
!+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_INF_täq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^WGStem%>n FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-PSS-PRF-PRC_tt ;



LEXICON V_82ANDMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ andma:and
!! * Yaml: __andma__
+V:%^WGStem%>a BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:a BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:a BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>sõ BACK_K ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_sõ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_sõ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_aq ;
+V:a BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_82PÜÜDMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ püüdmä:püüd
!! * Yaml: __pueuedmae__
+V:%^WGStemä FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:ä FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:ä FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>se FRONT_K ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG1_se ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_se ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_äq ;
+V:ä FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGSteme FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_83NÕSTMA  !!= * @CODE@ nõstma:nõst
!! gradation: no
!! * Yaml: __nwstma__
+V:a BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%>a BACK_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ; !! nõsta
+V:a BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V:a BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_sõ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_sõ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;
+V: MUTUAL_JUS_kuq ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_aq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_va ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:õ BACK_VISKAMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_83SÕITMA  !!= * @CODE@ sõitma:sõit
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: __switma__
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^WGStem%>a BACK_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WGStem%>at BACK_K ; 
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WGStem%>adõq BACK_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^WGStem%>amiq BACK_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^WGStem%>atiq BACK_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: BACK_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>vaq BACK_K ; 
+V:%^WGStem%>a BACK_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ; !! sõida

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^WGStem%>i BACK_K ; 
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>sõ BACK_K ; 

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>it BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>iq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>idõq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>sõt BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>sõq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>sõdõq BACK_K ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V:a BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>sõ BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>imiq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>sõmiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>itiq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>sõtiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>iq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ivaq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>sõq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>sõvaq BACK_K ;


+V:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_NÕSTMA-PSS-DISTRIBUTION ;

+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

+V: MUTUAL_JUS_kuq ;
+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_aq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_va ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_VISKAMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_83HEITMÄ  !!= * @CODE@ heitmä:heit
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: __heitmae__
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^WGStem%>ä FRONT_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ät FRONT_K ; 
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ädeq FRONT_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^WGStem%>ämiq FRONT_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^WGStem%>ätiq FRONT_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: FRONT_K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>väq FRONT_K ; 
+V:%^WGStem%>ä FRONT_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ; !! heidä

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^WGStem%>i FRONT_K ; 
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>se FRONT_K ; 

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>it FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>iq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ideq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>set FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>seq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>sedeq FRONT_K ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V:ä FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>se FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>imiq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>semiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>itiq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>setiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>iq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>iväq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>seq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>seväq FRONT_K ;

+V:%^WGStem%>e FRONT_NÕSTMA-PSS-DISTRIBUTION ;

+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

+V: MUTUAL_JUS_kuq ;
+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_äq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_vä ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem%>e FRONT_VISKAMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
