src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
andma:and V_82ANDMA  "" ;
atma:at V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
haardma:haard V_82ANDMA  "" ;
heitmä:heitmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
helähütmä:helähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
hiitmä:hiitmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
hoitma:hoit V_82ANDMA  "" ;
hämmähütmä:hämmähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
ikma:ik V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
jauhma:jauh V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
joudma:joud V_82ANDMA  "" ;
juutma:joot V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
jätmä:jätmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
jõudma:jõud V_82ANDMA  "" ;
jõõrdma:jõõrd V_82ANDMA  "" ;
kaibma:kaib V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kaitsma:kaits V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kandma:kand V_82ANDMA  "" ;
kastma:kast V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
katma:kat V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
keerähütmä:keerähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
kiildmä:kiild V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
kiirdmä:kiirdmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kiitmä:kiitmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kitmä:kitmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kostma:kost V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kuuldma:kuuld V_82ANDMA  "" ;
kärähütmä:kärähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
käskmä:käsk V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
käändmä:käänd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
käänähütmä:käänähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
köhähütmä:köhähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
köütmä:köütmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kükähütmä:kükähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
külbmä:külbmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
kündmä:künd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
kütmä:kütmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
küünähütmä:küünähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
laitma:lait V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
laskma:lask V_82ANDMA  "" ;
laulma:laul V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
leüdmä:leüd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
luutma:loot V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
läpähütmä:läpähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
läügähütmä:läügähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
löüdmä:löüd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
maitsma:maits V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
masma:mas V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
matma:mat V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
murdma:murd V_82ANDMA  "" ;
muutma:muuta V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
mõistma:mõist V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
mõskma:mõsk V_82ANDMA  "" ;
mõõtma:mõõt V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
möögähütmä:möögähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
mükähütmä:mükähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
mülmä:mülmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
mütmä:mütmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
mütsähütmä:mütsähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
naardma:naard V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
naardma:naar V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
neelähütmä:neelähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
niitmä:niit V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
nägemä:näg V_81TEGEMÄ  "" ;
närähütmä:närähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
niildmä:nîîld V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
nõstma:nõst V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
nõudma:nõud V_82ANDMA  "" ;
nühähütmä:nühähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
nüsmä:nüs V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
nüüstmä:nüüst V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
ostma:ost V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
paastma:paast V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
painma:pain V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
pandma:pand V_82ANDMA  "" ;
peerähütmä:peerähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
peesähütmä:peesähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
pesmä:pesmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
petmä:petmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
piirdmä:piird V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
pitsähütmä:pitsähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
puutma:poot V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
pästmä:pästmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
põlgma:põlg V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
pöörähütmä:pöörähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
püüdmä:püüd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
püündmä:püünd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
püürdmä:püürd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
roitma:roit V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
räütmä:räütmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
röögähütmä:röögähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
rüüsähütmä:rüüsähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
saatma:saat V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
saisma:sais V_82ANDMA  "" ;
segähütmä:segähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
serbähütmä:serbähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
sutma:sut V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
säädmä:sääd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
sõitma:sõit V_83SÕITMA  "" ;
sõudma:sõud V_82ANDMA  "" ;
süütmä:süütmä% II V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
süütmä:süütmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
tahtma:taht V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
taidma:taid V_82ANDMA  "" ;
taldma:tald V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
taltma:talt V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
tapma:tap V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
tegemä:teg V_81TEGEMÄ  "" ;
tehnähütmä:tehnähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tehähütmä:tehähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tiidmä:tiid V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
tsäbähütmä:tsäbähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tsäksähütmä:tsäksähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tsälgähütmä:tsälgähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tsämbähütmä:tsämbähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tsärähütmä:tsärähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
tundma:tund V_82ANDMA  "" ;
tänähütmä:tänähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
täütmä:täütmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
tüünähütmä:tüünähüt V_80HÄMMÄHÜTMÄ  "" ;
utma:ut V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
uurdma:uurd V_82ANDMA  "" ;
uutma:oot V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
valvma:valv V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
viitmä:viitmä V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
väärdmä:väärd V_82PÜÜDMÄ  "" ;
võidma:võid V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
võitma:võit V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
võtma:võt V_83NÕSTMA  "" ;
